src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Anambé language are words that may replace nouns or refer to participants in the conversation.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases ;
yha+Pron+Pers+Sg1:yha # "eu" ;
awãpaná+Pron+Pers+Sg2:awãpaná # "tu" ;
kuanũ+Pron+Pers+Pl3:kuanũ # "eles" ;
ná+Pron+Pers+Sg2:ná # "você" ;!CHECKME

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
